pt-PT: Perfil do painel: Cambagem; Plano; Baloiços; Outro
en: Board profile: Camber; Flat; Rocker; Other
el: Προφίλ πίνακα: Κύρτωμα; Επίπεδη; Άρθρωση; Άλλο
fi: Levyprofiili: Sivuvietto; Tasainen; Keinuva; Muu
ja: ボードプロファイル: キャンバー; フラット; ロッカー; その他
hu: Deszka profilja: Ívelt; Lapos; Egyensúlyozó; Egyéb
ko: 보드 프로필: 캠버; 플랫; 로커; 기타
zh-CN: 板外形: 正拱; 扁平的; 弯曲; 其他
vi: Hình dạng ván: Ván vồng; Phẳng; Ván võng; Khác
th: โปรไฟล์บอร์ด: แคมเบอร์; ราบ; ร็อคเกอร์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 版型輪廓: 弧面; 平坦; 滑雪板; 其他
pl: Profil deski: Ugięcie; Płaski; Wahacz; Inne
ro-RO: Profil placă: Camber; Flat; Rocker; Altele
sl-SI: Profil deske: Previs; Ravno; Gugalno; Drugo
nl: Dashboardprofiel: Camber; Vlak; Rocker; Andere
sv: Brädprofil: Camber; Platt; Rocker; Övrigt
sk-SK: Profil tabule: Ohnutý; Plochý; Kolísavý; Iné
nb: Brettprofil: Kamber; Flat; Rocker; Annet
bg-BG: Профил на дъската: Издута; Плоска; Люлка; Други
lt-LT: Lentos profilis: Išgaubtas; Plokščias; Lenktas; Kita
fr: Profil de la planche: Classique; Plate; Rocker; Autre
es: Perfil de tabla: Cángulo; Puro; Balancín; Otros
da: Brætprofil: Camber; Flad; Rocker; Andet
pt-BR: Perfil de prancha: Camber; Plana; Rocker; Outro
de: Brettprofil: Camber; Flach; Rocker; Sonstiges
ru: Профиль доски: Изогнутый; Плоский; Качающийся; Другой
cs: Profil prkna: Camber; Plochý; Rocker; Jiné
tr: Pano Profili: Kavis; Düz; Sallanan; Diğer
it: Profilo della tavola: Curvatura; Piatto; Rocker; Altro
hr-HR: Profil daske: Pod nagibom; Ravna; Klackalica; Ostalo